New York, session 2025-2026, A8877.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 52-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 52-a. Requirements with respect to bills affecting ratepayers' costs 4 for utility services. 1. For purposes of this section the term "ratepay- 5 er" means any person paying an electric corporation, a gas corporation, 6 a combination gas or electric corporation or a municipality for supply 7 utility services. 8 2. A bill which enacts or amends any provision of law relating to or 9 impacting the cost of utility services on a ratepayer shall contain a 10 fiscal note stating the estimated annual cost to the affected ratepayers 11 and the source of such estimate. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13144-01-5